Maryland, session 2026, SB0083.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health Occupations
2–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(c) “Board” means the State Board of Examiners for Audiologists, Hearing Aid
Dispensers, Speech–Language Pathologists, and Music Therapists.
2–314.
Subject to the hearing provisions of § 2–315 of this subtitle, the Board may deny a
license or limited license to any applicant, reprimand any licensee or holder of a limited
license, place any licensee or holder of a limited license on probation, or suspend or revoke
a license or limited license if the applicant, licensee, or holder:
(14) Is disciplined by a licensing or disciplinary authority of any other state
or country or convicted or disciplined by a court of any state or country, OR DISCIPLINED
BY ANY BRANCH OF THE UNIFORMED SERVICES OR THE U.S. DEPARTMENT OF
VETERANS AFFAIRS, for an act that would be grounds for disciplinary action under [this
section] THE BOARD’S DISCIPLINARY STATUTES;
4–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Board” means the State Board of Dental Examiners.
4–315.
(a) Subject to the hearing provisions of § 4–318 of this subtitle, the Board may
deny a general license to practice dentistry, a limited license to practice dentistry, or a
teacher’s license to practice dentistry to any applicant, reprimand any licensed dentist,
place any licensed dentist on probation, or suspend or revoke the license of any licensed
dentist, if the applicant or licensee:
(21) Is disciplined by a licensing or disciplinary authority of any other state
or country or convicted or disciplined by a court of any state or country, OR DISCIPLINED
BY ANY BRANCH OF THE UNIFORMED SERVICES OR THE U.S. DEPARTMENT OF
VETERANS AFFAIRS, for an act that would be grounds for disciplinary action under the
Board’s disciplinary statutes;
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 335
(c) Subject to the hearing provisions of § 4–318 of this subtitle, the Board may
deny a general license to practice dental hygiene, a teacher’s license to practice dental
hygiene, or a temporary license to practice dental hygiene to any applicant, reprimand any
licensed dental hygienist, place any licensed dental hygienist on probation, or suspend or
revoke the license of any licensed dental hygienist, if the applicant or licensee:
(6) Is disciplined by a licensing or disciplinary authority of any other state
or country or convicted or disciplined by a court of any state or country, OR DISCIPLINED
BY ANY BRANCH OF THE UNIFORMED SERVICES OR THE U.S. DEPARTMENT OF
VETERANS AFFAIRS, for an act that would be grounds for disciplinary action under the
Board’s disciplinary statutes;
5–101.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Board” means the State Board of Dietetic Practice.
5–311.
Subject to the hearing provisions of § 5–312 of this subtitle, the Board, on the
affirmative vote of a majority of its members then serving, may deny a license to any
applicant, reprimand any licensee, or suspend or revoke a license if the applicant or
licensee:
(12) Is disciplined by a licensing or disciplinary authority of any other state
or country or convicted or disciplined by a court of any other state or country, OR
DISCIPLINED BY ANY BRANCH OF THE UNIFORMED SERVICES OR THE U.S.
DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS, for an act that would be grounds for disciplinary
action under [this section] THE BOARD’S DISCIPLINARY STATUTES;
11–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Board” means the State Board of Examiners in Optometry.
11–313.
Subject to the hearing provisions of § 11–315 of this subtitle, the Board, on the
affirmative vote of a majority of its members then serving, may deny a license to any
applicant, reprimand any licensee, place any licensee on probation, or suspend or revoke a
license if the applicant or licensee:
– 3 –

Ch. 335 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(20) Has had a license to practice optometry denied, suspended or revoked
in another state, OR HAS BEEN DISCIPLINED BY ANY BRANCH OF THE UNIFORMED
SERVICES OR THE U.S. DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS, for an act which would
be grounds for disciplinary action under [this section] THE BOARD’S DISCIPLINARY
STATUTES;
12–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(d) “Board” means the State Board of Pharmacy.
12–313.
(b) Subject to the hearing provisions of § 12–315 of this subtitle, the Board, on the
affirmative vote of a majority of its members then serving, may deny a license to any
applicant for a pharmacist’s license, reprimand any licensee, place any licensee on
probation, or suspend or revoke a license of a pharmacist if the applicant or licensee:
(24) Is disciplined by a licensing or disciplinary authority of any state or
country or convicted or disciplined by a court of any state or country, OR DISCIPLINED BY
ANY BRANCH OF THE UNIFORMED SERVICES OR THE U.S. DEPARTMENT OF
VETERANS AFFAIRS, for an act that would be grounds for disciplinary action under the
Board’s disciplinary statutes;
13–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Board” means the State Board of Physical Therapy Examiners.
13–316.
Subject to the hearing provisions of § 13–317 of this subtitle, the Board may deny a
license or restricted license to any applicant, reprimand any licensee or holder of a
restricted license, place any licensee or holder of a restricted license on probation, or
suspend or revoke a license or restricted license if the applicant, licensee, or holder:
(10) Is disciplined by a licensing or disciplinary authority of any state or
country or convicted or disciplined by a court of any state or country, or disciplined by any
branch of the uniformed services or [Veterans Administration] U.S. DEPARTMENT OF
VETERANS AFFAIRS, for an act that would be grounds for disciplinary action under the
Board’s disciplinary statutes;
14–101.
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 335
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Board” means the State Board of Physicians.
14–404.
(a) Subject to the hearing provisions of § 14–405 of this subtitle, a disciplinary
panel, on the affirmative vote of a majority of the quorum of the disciplinary panel, may
reprimand any licensee, place any licensee on probation, or suspend or revoke a license if
the licensee:
(21) Is disciplined by a licensing or disciplinary authority or convicted or
disciplined by a court of any state or country, or disciplined by any branch of the uniformed
services or the [Veterans’ Administration] U.S. DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS,
for an act that would be grounds for disciplinary action under [this section] THE BOARD’S
DISCIPLINARY STATUTES;
14–5A–01.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(c) “Committee” means the Respiratory Care Advisory Committee established
under § 14–5A–05 of this subtitle.
14–5A–17.
(a) Subject to the hearing provisions of § 14–405 of this title, a disciplinary panel,
on the affirmative vote of a majority of a quorum of the disciplinary panel, may deny a
license to any applicant, reprimand any licensee, place any licensee on probation, or
suspend or revoke a license, if the applicant or licensee:
(17) Is disciplined by a licensing or disciplinary authority or is convicted or
disciplined by a court of any state or country, or [is] disciplined by any branch of the
uniformed services or the [Veterans’ Administration] U.S. DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS
AFFAIRS, for an act that would be grounds for disciplinary action under the Board’s
disciplinary statutes;
14–5B–01.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(d) “Committee” means the Radiation Therapy, Radiography, Nuclear Medicine
Technology, and Radiology Assistance Advisory Committee of the Board.
14–5B–14.
– 5 –

Ch. 335 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(a) Subject to the hearing provisions of § 14–405 of this title, a disciplinary panel,
on the affirmative vote of a majority of the quorum of the disciplinary panel, may deny a
license to any applicant, reprimand any licensee, place any licensee on probation, or
suspend or revoke a license, if the applicant or licensee:
(17) Is disciplined by a licensing or disciplinary authority or is convicted or
disciplined by a court of any state or country, or is disciplined by any branch of the
uniformed services or the U.S. Department of Veterans Affairs, for an act that would be
grounds for disciplinary action under the Board’s disciplinary statutes;
14–5C–01.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(c) “Committee” means the Polysomnography Advisory Committee established
under § 14–5C–05 of this subtitle.
14–5C–17.
(a) Subject to the hearing provisions of § 14–405 of this title, a disciplinary panel,
on the affirmative vote of a majority of a quorum of the disciplinary panel, may deny a
license to any applicant, reprimand any licensee, place any licensee on probation, or
suspend or revoke a license, if the applicant or licensee:
(18) Is disciplined by a licensing or disciplinary authority or is convicted or
disciplined by a court of any state or country, or is disciplined by any branch of the
uniformed services or the U.S. Department of Veterans Affairs, for an act that would be
grounds for disciplinary action under the Board’s disciplinary statutes;
14–5D–01.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(e) “Committee” means the Athletic Trainer Advisory Committee established
under § 14–5D–04 of this subtitle.
14–5D–14.
(a) Subject to the hearing provisions of § 14–405 of this title, a disciplinary panel,
on the affirmative vote of a majority of a quorum of the disciplinary panel, may deny a
license to any applicant, reprimand any licensee, place any licensee on probation, or
suspend or revoke a license, if the applicant or licensee:
(17) Is disciplined by a licensing, certifying, or disciplinary authority or is
convicted or disciplined by a court of any state or country, or [is] disciplined by any branch
– 6 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 335
of the uniformed services or the [Veterans Administration] U.S. DEPARTMENT OF
VETERANS AFFAIRS, for an act that would be grounds for disciplinary action under [this
section] THE BOARD’S DISCIPLINARY STATUTES;
14–5E–01.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(c) “Committee” means the Perfusion Advisory Committee established under §
14–5E–05 of this subtitle.
14–5E–16.
(a) Subject to the hearing provisions of § 14–405 of this title, a disciplinary panel,
on the affirmative vote of a majority of the quorum of the disciplinary panel, may deny a
license to any applicant, reprimand any licensee, place any licensee on probation, or
suspend or revoke a license, if the applicant or licensee:
(18) Is disciplined by a licensing or disciplinary authority or is convicted or
disciplined by a court of any state or country, or [is] disciplined by any branch of the
uniformed services or the U.S. Department of Veterans Affairs, for an act that would be
grounds for disciplinary action under the Board’s disciplinary statutes;
14–5F–01.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(d) “Committee” means the Naturopathic Medicine Advisory Committee.
14–5F–18.
(a) Subject to the hearing provisions of § 14–405 of this title, a disciplinary panel,
on the affirmative vote of a majority of a quorum of the disciplinary panel, may deny a
license to any applicant, reprimand any licensee, place any licensee on probation, or
suspend or revoke a license of any licensee if the applicant or licensee:
[(5) Has a license revoked or suspended, or was otherwise acted against,
including the denial of licensure, by the licensing authority of another state;]
(5) IS DISCIPLINED BY A LICENSING, CERTIFYING, OR DISCIPLINARY
AUTHORITY OR IS CONVICTED OR DISCIPLINED BY A COURT OF ANY STATE OR
COUNTRY, OR DISCIPLINED BY ANY BRANCH OF THE UNIFORMED SERVICES OR THE
U.S. DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS, FOR AN ACT THAT WOULD BE GROUNDS
FOR DISCIPLINARY ACTION UNDER THE BOARD’S DISCIPLINARY STATUTES;
– 7 –

Ch. 335 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
14–5G–01.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(d) “Committee” means the Genetic Counselors Advisory Committee.
14–5G–18.
(a) Subject to the hearing provisions of § 14–405 of this title, a disciplinary panel,
on the affirmative vote of a majority of the quorum of the disciplinary panel, may deny a
license to any applicant, reprimand any licensee, place any licensee on probation, or
suspend or revoke a license, if the applicant or licensee:
(19) Is disciplined by a licensing or disciplinary authority or is convicted or
disciplined by a court of any state or country, or [is] disciplined by any branch of the
uniformed services or the U.S. Department of Veterans Affairs, for an act that would be
grounds for disciplinary action under the Board’s disciplinary statutes;
15–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(c) “Board” means the State Board of Physicians, established under § 14–201 of
this article.
(f) “Committee” means the Physician Assistant Advisory Committee.
15–314.
(a) Subject to the hearing provisions of § 15–315 of this subtitle, a disciplinary
panel, on the affirmative vote of a majority of the quorum, may reprimand any physician
assistant, place any physician assistant on probation, or suspend or revoke a license if the
physician assistant:
(21) Is disciplined by a licensing or disciplinary authority or convicted or
disciplined by a court of any state or country, or disciplined by any branch of the uniformed
services or the [Veterans’ Administration] U.S. DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS,
for an act that would be grounds for disciplinary action under [this section] THE BOARD’S
DISCIPLINARY STATUTES;
16–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Board” means the State Board of Podiatric Medical Examiners.
– 8 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 335
16–311.
(a) Subject to the hearing provisions of § 16–313 of this subtitle, the Board, on the
affirmative vote of a majority of its members then serving, may deny a license or a limited
license to any applicant, reprimand any licensee or holder of a limited license, impose an
administrative monetary penalty not exceeding $50,000 on any licensee or holder of a
limited license, place any licensee or holder of a limited license on probation, or suspend or
revoke a license or a limited license if the applicant, licensee, or holder:
(21) Has been disciplined by a licensing or disciplinary authority of any state
or country or convicted or disciplined by a court of any state or country, or disciplined by
any branch of the uniformed services or the [United States Veterans Administration] U.S.
DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS, for an act that would be grounds for disciplinary
action under [this section] THE BOARD’S DISCIPLINARY STATUTES;
17–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(e) “Board” means the State Board of Professional Counselors and Therapists.
17–6A–19.
Subject to the hearing provisions of § 17–6A–21 of this subtitle, the Board, on the
affirmative vote of a majority of its members then serving, may deny a license to any
applicant, reprimand any licensee, place any licensee on probation, or suspend or revoke a
license of any licensee if the applicant or licensee:
(10) Is disciplined by a licensing or disciplinary authority of any state or
country or convicted or disciplined by a court of any state or country, or disciplined by any
branch of the uniformed services or the [United States Veterans Administration] U.S.
DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS, for an act that would be grounds for disciplinary
action under the Board’s disciplinary statutes;
18–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Board” means the State Board of Examiners of Psychologists.
18–313.
Subject to the hearing provisions of § 18–315 of this subtitle, the Board, on the
affirmative vote of a majority of its members then serving, may deny a license or
registration to any applicant, reprimand any licensee or registrant, place any licensee or
– 9 –

Ch. 335 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
registrant on probation, or suspend or revoke a license or registration of any licensee or
registrant if the applicant, licensee, or registrant:
(11) Is disciplined by a licensing or disciplinary authority of any state or
country or convicted or disciplined by a court of any state or country, or disciplined by any
branch of the uniformed services or the [United States Veterans Administration] U.S.
DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS, for an act that would be grounds for disciplinary
action under the Board’s disciplinary statutes;
19–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Board” means the State Board of Social Work Examiners.
19–311.
Subject to the hearing provisions of § 19–312 of this subtitle, the Board may deny a
license to any applicant, fine a licensee, reprimand any licensee, place any licensee on
probation, or suspend or revoke a license if the applicant or licensee:
(9) Is disciplined by a licensing or disciplinary authority of any state[,] OR
country[, or branch of the armed services, or the Veterans’ Administration] OR
CONVICTED OR DISCIPLINED BY A COURT OF ANY STATE OR COUNTRY, OR
DISCIPLINED BY ANY BRANCH OF THE UNIFORMED SERVICES OR THE U.S.
DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS, for an act that would be grounds for disciplinary
action under [this section] THE BOARD’S DISCIPLINARY STATUTES;
21–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Board” means the State Board of Environmental Health Specialists.
21–312.
(b) Subject to the hearing provisions of § 21–313 of this subtitle, the Board, on the
affirmative vote of a majority of its full authorized membership, may deny any applicant
licensure, reprimand any licensee, or place any individual who is licensed on probation, or
suspend or revoke a license, if the applicant or licensee:
(7) Is disciplined by a licensing or disciplinary authority of any other state
or country or convicted or disciplined by a court of any state or country, OR DISCIPLINED
BY ANY BRANCH OF THE UNIFORMED SERVICES OR THE U.S. DEPARTMENT OF
– 10 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 335
VETERANS AFFAIRS, for an act that would be grounds for disciplinary action under the
Board’s disciplinary statutes;
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, April 28, 2026.
– 11 –